Hawaii statutes.
PART V. ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS

[§431:3A-501]
Protection of Fair Credit Reporting Act. Nothing in this article shall be construed to modify, limit, or supersede
the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, Title 15 United States Code section
1681, et seq., as amended, and no inference shall be drawn on the basis of the
provisions of this article regarding whether information is transaction or
experience information under Title 15 United States Code section 602, et seq.,
as amended. [L 2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next